engine/dictionaries/si_LK/si_LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 3146 Y 1
SFX 3146 0 රාළ .
SFX 1304 Y 1
SFX 1304 0 වන්නා .
SFX 4317 Y 1
SFX 4317 0 වන්නී .
SFX 4925 Y 1
SFX 4925 0 ජිකත්වය .
SFX 1677 Y 1
SFX 1677 0 වන්නෙ .
SFX 167 Y 1
SFX 167 0 වන්නේ .
SFX 2810 Y 1
SFX 2810 0 ියන්ටත් .
SFX 4103 Y 1
SFX 4103 0 හදා .
SFX 1612 Y 1
SFX 1612 0 ුණහොත් .
SFX 1757 Y 1
SFX 1757 0 තාවෙන් .
SFX 2617 Y 1
SFX 2617 0 කුණු .
SFX 1586 Y 1
SFX 1586 0 ේදීද .
SFX 434 Y 1
SFX 434 0 ේදීම .
SFX 475 Y 1
SFX 475 0 ේදීය .
SFX 673 Y 1
SFX 673 0 කරන්න .
SFX 4247 Y 1
SFX 4247 0 වැසියෝ .
SFX 4819 Y 1
SFX 4819 0 ත්විය .
SFX 1929 Y 1
SFX 1929 0 හිමි .
SFX 2209 Y 1
SFX 2209 0 ුම්වලට .
SFX 2143 Y 1
SFX 2143 0 කම්වලින් .
SFX 2539 Y 1
SFX 2539 0 දෙනිය .
SFX 743 Y 1
SFX 743 0 ම්වලින් .
SFX 1119 Y 1
SFX 1119 0 කරන්නට .
SFX 849 Y 1
SFX 849 0 රුන් .
SFX 808 Y 1
SFX 808 0 කරන්නේ .
SFX 2635 Y 1
SFX 2635 0 කලක් .
SFX 2119 Y 1
SFX 2119 0 ගමට .
SFX 1142 Y 1
SFX 1142 0 ියේදී .
SFX 4964 Y 1
SFX 4964 0 ගමන .
SFX 639 Y 1
SFX 639 0 යකටම .
SFX 1710 Y 1
SFX 1710 0 යකටය .
SFX 1008 Y 1
SFX 1008 0 ගම් .
SFX 2117 Y 1
SFX 2117 0 ගමු .
SFX 4062 Y 1
SFX 4062 0 ළුවට .
SFX 2963 Y 1
SFX 2963 0 හානි .
SFX 4059 Y 1
SFX 4059 0 ළුවේ .
SFX 2084 Y 1
SFX 2084 0 තාවලට .
SFX 4701 Y 1
SFX 4701 0 න්තරය .
SFX 814 Y 1
SFX 814 0 ්වූයේ .
SFX 1588 Y 1
SFX 1588 0 ෙහිදී .
SFX 992 Y 1
SFX 992 0 භාවයට .
SFX 1880 Y 1
SFX 1880 0 ිරීමට .
SFX 2577 Y 1
SFX 2577 0 ණේය .
SFX 23 Y 1
SFX 23 0 යෙන් .
SFX 4469 Y 1
SFX 4469 0 යෙකුටම .
SFX 3918 Y 1
SFX 3918 0 ැලීමට .
SFX 228 Y 1
SFX 228 0 යෙනි .
SFX 3791 Y 1
SFX 3791 0 ිරීමේ .
SFX 3366 Y 1
SFX 3366 0 ණේ් .
SFX 2254 Y 1
SFX 2254 0 ිනිය .
SFX 4140 Y 1
SFX 4140 0 සුනට .
SFX 3493 Y 1
SFX 3493 0 ්ලක .
SFX 1227 Y 1
SFX 1227 0 ්ලට .
SFX 3874 Y 1
SFX 3874 0 ිගෙන් .
SFX 4388 Y 1
SFX 4388 0 ලාගත් .
SFX 1936 Y 1
SFX 1936 0 සුන් .
SFX 1017 Y 1
SFX 1017 0 ්ලා .
SFX 1798 Y 1
SFX 1798 0 ්ලි .
SFX 1797 Y 1
SFX 1797 0 ්ලු .
SFX 932 Y 1
SFX 932 0 ්ලේ .
SFX 4793 Y 1
SFX 4793 0 දික .
SFX 1201 Y 1
SFX 1201 0 දිග .
SFX 4487 Y 1
SFX 4487 0 යාණෝ .
SFX 1921 Y 1
SFX 1921 0 ාගාරයෙන් .
SFX 2424 Y 1
SFX 2424 0 රියක .
SFX 1003 Y 1
SFX 1003 0 දින .
SFX 3142 Y 1
SFX 3142 0 රියට .
SFX 2072 Y 1
SFX 2072 0 දිම .
SFX 469 Y 1
SFX 469 0 දිය .
SFX 1493 Y 1
SFX 1493 0 පොළට .
SFX 4451 Y 1
SFX 4451 0 රණයෙන් .
SFX 694 Y 1
SFX 694 0 වීමේදී .
SFX 4786 Y 1
SFX 4786 0 දිව .
SFX 3108 Y 1
SFX 3108 0 ලේඛන .
SFX 1663 Y 1
SFX 1663 0 වුම් .
SFX 765 Y 1
SFX 765 0 ේදැයි .
SFX 3740 Y 1
SFX 3740 0 ීමෙහිලා .
SFX 2422 Y 1
SFX 2422 0 රියේ .
SFX 4468 Y 1
SFX 4468 0 යෙනුයි .
SFX 1332 Y 1
SFX 1332 0 පොළේ .
SFX 759 Y 1
SFX 759 0 කරුවන්ගෙන් .
SFX 389 Y 1
SFX 389 0 න්ටත් .
SFX 1178 Y 1
SFX 1178 0 ලටත් .
SFX 4408 Y 1
SFX 4408 0 රෙක් .
SFX 4409 Y 1
SFX 4409 0 රෙකු .
SFX 496 Y 1
SFX 496 0 ුවන් .
SFX 2929 Y 1
SFX 2929 0 ාධිකරණයට .
SFX 4502 Y 1
SFX 4502 0 යමක් .
SFX 1079 Y 1
SFX 1079 0 රන් .
SFX 1064 Y 1
SFX 1064 0 වලටද .
SFX 4296 Y 1
SFX 4296 0 වලටය .
SFX 4919 Y 1
SFX 4919 0 ඥයින්ගේ .
SFX 1388 Y 1
SFX 1388 0 ුවාට .
SFX 3660 Y 1
SFX 3660 0 ුවාද .
SFX 1707 Y 1
SFX 1707 0 ‍යයක් .
SFX 2740 Y 1
SFX 2740 0 ුවාම .
SFX 2739 Y 1
SFX 2739 0 ුවාය .
SFX 2371 Y 1
SFX 2371 0 වාලීමට .
SFX 3868 Y 1
SFX 3868 0 ිතට .
SFX 4796 Y 1
SFX 4796 0 දැකීමට .
SFX 3209 Y 1
SFX 3209 0 මානයක් .
SFX 954 Y 1
SFX 954 0 ිතය .
SFX 2240 Y 1
SFX 2240 0 ියහොත් .
SFX 1900 Y 1
SFX 1900 0 ිතව .
SFX 598 Y 1
SFX 598 0 ිත් .
SFX 3436 Y 1
SFX 3436 0 කවි .
SFX 2831 Y 1
SFX 2831 0 ිතා .
SFX 1043 Y 1
SFX 1043 0 ිති .
SFX 4777 Y 1
SFX 4777 0 දුම් .
SFX 801 Y 1
SFX 801 0 තින් .
SFX 2089 Y 1
SFX 2089 0 තලය .
SFX 1424 Y 1
SFX 1424 0 ාදැයි .
SFX 2843 Y 1
SFX 2843 0 ිකිරීමේ .
SFX 2169 Y 1
SFX 2169 0 ්ඩත් .
SFX 386 Y 1
SFX 386 0 වරයාට .
SFX 2984 Y 1
SFX 2984 0 සියට .
SFX 3067 Y 1
SFX 3067 0 වරයාද .
SFX 3524 Y 1
SFX 3524 0 ්නන්ගෙන් .
SFX 2381 Y 1
SFX 2381 0 වරයාය .
SFX 1106 Y 1
SFX 1106 0 තලා .
SFX 3359 Y 1
SFX 3359 0 තලේ .
SFX 2105 Y 1
SFX 2105 0 ජෝති .
SFX 1301 Y 1
SFX 1301 0 වරයාව .
SFX 777 Y 1
SFX 777 0 ිකාවක් .
SFX 2981 Y 1
SFX 2981 0 සියේ .
SFX 2850 Y 1
SFX 2850 0 ිකාවකි .
SFX 4260 Y 1
SFX 4260 0 වැඩියා .
SFX 3162 Y 1
SFX 3162 0 රගත .
SFX 2159 Y 1
SFX 2159 0 ්මන් .
SFX 4448 Y 1
SFX 4448 0 රත්නයන් .
SFX 3604 Y 1
SFX 3604 0 ෙස්වල .
SFX 863 Y 1
SFX 863 0 ජනක .
SFX 2049 Y 1
SFX 2049 0 නෙන් .
SFX 4458 Y 1
SFX 4458 0 රගේ .
SFX 845 Y 1
SFX 845 0 වකුට .
SFX 2553 Y 1
SFX 2553 0 දවීමට .
SFX 1657 Y 1
SFX 1657 0 ශීලීව .
SFX 3199 Y 1
SFX 3199 0 මුල්ලේ .
SFX 4245 Y 1
SFX 4245 0 විජය .
SFX 3942 Y 1
SFX 3942 0 ාහම .
SFX 3085 Y 1
SFX 3085 0 වන්ගෙ .
SFX 293 Y 1
SFX 293 0 වන්ගේ .
SFX 2323 Y 1
SFX 2323 0 හක් .
SFX 4882 Y 1
SFX 4882 0 ණුවල .
SFX 2284 Y 1
SFX 2284 0 ාහි .
SFX 1208 Y 1
SFX 1208 0 තාවයකින් .
SFX 1927 Y 1
SFX 1927 0 ෆ් .
SFX 4193 Y 1
SFX 4193 0 ශීලිත්වය .
SFX 4057 Y 1
SFX 4057 0 ෆා .
SFX 3792 Y 1
SFX 3792 0 ිරීමත් .
SFX 4558 Y 1
SFX 4558 0 මික .
SFX 746 Y 1
SFX 746 0 නීය .
SFX 3202 Y 1
SFX 3202 0 මිත .
SFX 4851 Y 1
SFX 4851 0 තාවන්ගෙන් .
SFX 2458 Y 1
SFX 2458 0 මිල .
SFX 1298 Y 1
SFX 1298 0 වායි .
SFX 2026 Y 1
SFX 2026 0 මයෙන් .
SFX 4633 Y 1
SFX 4633 0 පිටියෙන් .
SFX 4120 Y 1
SFX 4120 0 ස්ථානයේදී .
SFX 1019 Y 1
SFX 1019 0 ්නේද .
SFX 1018 Y 1
SFX 1018 0 ්නේය .
SFX 4935 Y 1
SFX 4935 0 චාරයක් .
SFX 1297 Y 1
SFX 1297 0 වීමකින් .
SFX 3414 Y 1
SFX 3414 0 කෘති .
SFX 3996 Y 1
SFX 3996 0 ාමයි .
SFX 1275 Y 1
SFX 1275 0 ිකයන්ට .
SFX 2161 Y 1
SFX 2161 0 ්නේ් .
SFX 4253 Y 1
SFX 4253 0 වැලක් .
SFX 2782 Y 1
SFX 2782 0 ීමෙහි .
SFX 84 Y 1
SFX 84 0 න්ගෙන් .
SFX 3672 Y 1
SFX 3672 0 ුල්ල .
SFX 4001 Y 1
SFX 4001 0 ාපත් .
SFX 3492 Y 1
SFX 3492 0 ්ලකට .
SFX 470 Y 1
SFX 470 0 දායක .
SFX 1635 Y 1
SFX 1635 0 ැසුම් .
SFX 2583 Y 1
SFX 2583 0 ණියක් .
SFX 4887 Y 1
SFX 4887 0 ණියකි .
SFX 3491 Y 1
SFX 3491 0 ්ලක් .
SFX 1545 Y 1
SFX 1545 0 කාරීව .
SFX 1202 Y 1
SFX 1202 0 දායි .
SFX 917 Y 1
SFX 917 0 දායී .
SFX 986 Y 1
SFX 986 0 ලන්නට .
SFX 872 Y 1
SFX 872 0 ්නේත් .
SFX 4539 Y 1
SFX 4539 0 මුවන් .
SFX 4410 Y 1
SFX 4410 0 රූපයට .
SFX 1759 Y 1
SFX 1759 0 තයෙන් .
SFX 4397 Y 1
SFX 4397 0 ලන්නේ .
SFX 2452 Y 1
SFX 2452 0 යකටවත් .
SFX 2797 Y 1
SFX 2797 0 ිල්ලක .
SFX 546 Y 1
SFX 546 0 ගන්නට .
SFX 3379 Y 1
SFX 3379 0 ටක් .
SFX 2232 Y 1
SFX 2232 0 ිල්ලට .
SFX 4269 Y 1
SFX 4269 0 වාරයේ .
SFX 4968 Y 1
SFX 4968 0 ගන්නව .
SFX 3830 Y 1
SFX 3830 0 ිඳුන් .
SFX 300 Y 1
SFX 300 0 ගන්නා .
SFX 2121 Y 1
SFX 2121 0 ගන්නෙ .
SFX 493 Y 1
SFX 493 0 ගන්නේ .
SFX 3782 Y 1
SFX 3782 0 ිල්ලා .
SFX 2231 Y 1
SFX 2231 0 ිල්ලේ .
SFX 4266 Y 1
SFX 4266 0 වාසය .
SFX 1097 Y 1
SFX 1097 0 පිටියේ .
SFX 2457 Y 1
SFX 2457 0 මුත් .
SFX 2652 Y 1
SFX 2652 0 ්වීමටත් .
SFX 3316 Y 1
SFX 3316 0 දොර .
SFX 2370 Y 1
SFX 2370 0 වාසි .
SFX 1167 Y 1
SFX 1167 0 වාසී .
SFX 2864 Y 1
SFX 2864 0 ෑටි .
SFX 1463 Y 1
SFX 1463 0 වරයන් .
SFX 2134 Y 1
SFX 2134 0 කාමීන් .
SFX 4233 Y 1
SFX 4233 0 විහාර .
SFX 2151 Y 1
SFX 2151 0 ්වීමයි .
SFX 3858 Y 1
SFX 3858 0 ිතාවය .
SFX 4763 Y 1
SFX 4763 0 ද්වීපය .
SFX 4849 Y 1
SFX 4849 0 තාවයයි .
SFX 2649 Y 1
SFX 2649 0 ්වුවහොත් .
SFX 3274 Y 1
SFX 3274 0 න්තය .
SFX 3271 Y 1
SFX 3271 0 න්තර .
SFX 3311 Y 1
SFX 3311 0 ධාරීන් .
SFX 2044 Y 1
SFX 2044 0 න්ති .
SFX 3568 Y 1
SFX 3568 0 ෝචිත .
SFX 1760 Y 1
SFX 1760 0 තයක් .
SFX 4869 Y 1
SFX 4869 0 තයකි .
SFX 4676 Y 1
SFX 4676 0 ඳුම .
SFX 4963 Y 1
SFX 4963 0 ගයත් .
SFX 4422 Y 1
SFX 4422 0 රීමක් .
SFX 4934 Y 1
SFX 4934 0 චාරාත්මක .
SFX 87 Y 1
SFX 87 0 ක්ද .
SFX 181 Y 1
SFX 181 0 ක්ම .
SFX 1362 Y 1
SFX 1362 0 ක්ය .
SFX 2548 Y 1
SFX 2548 0 දාස් .
SFX 3172 Y 1
SFX 3172 0 යැයිද .
SFX 1773 Y 1
SFX 1773 0 චන්ද්‍ර .
SFX 573 Y 1
SFX 573 0 ක්ව .
SFX 3408 Y 1
SFX 3408 0 ක්් .
SFX 4262 Y 1
SFX 4262 0 වැටුණු .
SFX 2788 Y 1
SFX 2788 0 ීගිය .
SFX 3156 Y 1
SFX 3156 0 රම්භ .
SFX 4212 Y 1
SFX 4212 0 වෙච්ච .
SFX 3426 Y 1
SFX 3426 0 කාවට .
SFX 4738 Y 1
SFX 4738 0 නාන්සේලා .
SFX 2781 Y 1
SFX 2781 0 ීම්වල .
SFX 1784 Y 1
SFX 1784 0 කාරියක් .
SFX 4019 Y 1
SFX 4019 0 ාධිකරණ .
SFX 3424 Y 1
SFX 3424 0 කාවෝ .
SFX 3975 Y 1
SFX 3975 0 ාලයත් .
SFX 1923 Y 1
SFX 1923 0 ාගත්තේ .
SFX 3939 Y 1
SFX 3939 0 ැක .
SFX 3930 Y 1
SFX 3930 0 ැන .
SFX 3143 Y 1
SFX 3143 0 ‍රිය .
SFX 2275 Y 1
SFX 2275 0 ැව .
SFX 2271 Y 1
SFX 2271 0 ැස .
SFX 1340 Y 1
SFX 1340 0 නවාට .
SFX 1100 Y 1
SFX 1100 0 නවාද .
SFX 1328 Y 1
SFX 1328 0 මුල්ල .
