engine/dictionaries/si_LK/si_LK.dic
අතු/26,57,88,169,254,299,442,583,616,788,789,849,1079,1080,1181,1681,1693,2416,2608,3157
අරුත්/1936
අහු/196,244,254,442,500,602,608,1296,2431,3158,4209,4388,4403
ඇසු/10,38,96,112,118,145,162,178,276,462,510,534,602,659,979,2577,2578
ඉදිරි/5,245,793,1189,1333,1360,2494,2624,3240,3427,4663,4964
ඉදිරිය/1,2,8,30,32,36,47,77,91,100,133,199,302,435,1132,1586
උදාසීන/2084
කථා/246,261,361,490,1119,2520,2634,3292,4701,4736
කැවිල/16,3493
ගැට/2,14,41,49,59,69,80,107,111,119,120,122,148,154,160,164,195,209,214,229,238,304,315,377,378,385,426,460,528,554,556,578,582,624,656,976,1043,1133,1333,1463,1648,2024,2115,2311,2475,4062
ජීව/3,5,9,14,15,16,17,23,33,41,42,115,225,334,342,349,352,431,508,611,726,727,744,777,881,914,1035,1522,1615,1629,1752,1894,4817,4818,4819
දිව/1,4,6,16,20,21,41,52,59,71,83,104,107,111,129,160,176,186,187,229,232,280,281,318,319,342,387,394,459,518,554,559,715,725,871,951,1026,1084,1142,1855,1886,1904,2156,2185,2231,2232,2271,2443,2445,3169,3495,3846,3911,4479
දිවි/1706,2963
දෙසුම/1588
නතර/10,54,63,82,85,86,218,223,264,292,533,673
නන්/37,54,125,278,1518,3339,4793
නින්ද/1,2,4,8,20,21,32,272,335,437,746,778,930,940,1008,1086
පරිපූර්ණ/86,167,206
පහක/1,6,16,18,30,139,170,179,314,583,1080,1146,1620,2003,3791
පැණි/3,5,23,31,2539,2541
පැවරු/1354,3366
පුංචි/7,301,474,1718,3146,4645
පුත්‍ර/27,49,52,78,90,154,185,236,369,538,1085,2019,4487
පුරවැසි/49,89,93,119,154,159,273,310,339,466,539,1489,2029,4469
පෙන්/900,1304,1973,3071,3301,3304,4317,4334,4723
ප්‍රශ්න/2,3,5,13,14,15,19,23,26,27,29,31,44,47,55,56,64,68,71,74,94,142,171,232,269,324,565,639,779,1188,1840,2901,3960,4267
ප්‍රේම/3,14,15,19,20,23,27,40,44,55,56,71,334,342,343,359,377,543,588,693,726,846,1184,1682,1710,1773,2523,3455,4936
බඳුන/2,4,6,17,101,242,393,410,814,1564
බාර/2,6,10,16,19,22,23,41,61,76,82,85,94,113,158,235,261,300,332,401,407,458,469,471,493,524,572,614,712,749,806,932,1514,1746,1798,1819,2066,2114,2962,3309,3320,4774
බැති/9,14,23,56,78,81,228,4611
බෙදා/22,61,113,158,268,329,332,458,469,712,1619,2117,2320,3824,4095,4103
මාගල/1017
මැඩ/61,69,402,403,441,700,737,1992,3918
මිහිරි/499,1304,2522
මෙහෙය/37,76,86,122,130,144,146,157,194,198,223,259,351,564,652,694,721,732,841,843,895,900,972,973,1028,1059,1251,1392,1454,1666,1677,1856,1905,2209,2273,2752,2753,2758,2869,2870,3685,3687,3701,3913,3914,4329,4334
රෝග/3,6,11,14,15,16,18,19,23,27,29,31,41,44,47,48,56,68,74,121,124,169,228,240,255,334,342,465,726,881,1035,1038,1064,1139,1144,1215,1266,1615,1888,2254,3750
වත්/7,11,81,85,89,159,279,301,454,647,648,763,1549,1929,2077,2993
වන්නි/141,345,490,588,931,1548,1786,2119
වැල/1,2,4,6,8,16,17,18,25,36,358,402,598,675,773,826,932,947,1098,1213,1227,2259,2503,2617,2620,2659,2882,3232,3420,4679
වැළඳ/2,24,41,52,59,61,80,83,107,111,113,120,209,229,268,277,300,327,554,865,1009,1112,1612
විඳ/16,41,52,54,57,59,61,62,80,107,113,122,238,241,268,307,332,341,351,366,524,535,546,712,776,885,901,952,985,1042,1043,1145,1403,1404,1628,1677,2075,2248,2821,2825,3836,3843
විමසු/10,37,38,50,67,69,103,297,321,340,388,659,743,911,2455
විය/1,2,5,8,9,20,32,33,36,62,79,83,99,114,115,149,239,241,245,254,265,402,409,434,435,498,519,608,789,791,908,915,1075,1203,1213,1431,1522,1535,1581,1648,2049,2315,2514,2557,2881,3340,3562,3569,3595,3726,3727,4007,4051,4059,4064,4065,4067,4070,4411,4414,4809
විල්/1126,2117,4615
වෙන්/647,758,808,1115,1369,2126,2137,4999
වොෂින්ටනය/1,2,32,475
ශික්ෂණ/3,14,23,48,1192
සදා/61,535,868,2415,2635,3129
සමාන/3,10,13,15,54,63,75,138,159,201,204,214,301,394,635,1122,1757,3542
සහෝදර/27,49,52,64,75,78,89,90,104,119,141,152,176,185,189,312,318,319,331,474,538,580,828,1088,2810,2811,3170
සැප/4,5,6,8,15,34,59,80,144,233,508,770,851,1880,3165,3166,3235,4470,4471,4817
සිදු/85,142,170,218,246,254,279,371,503,547,548,549,647,673,739,758,760,788,807,808,1012,1052,1119,1217,1219,1246,1549,1701,1779,2126,2130,2416,2511,2619,2634,3413,4998,4999
සිහ/57,583,1593,4140
සෙවණ/1,2,4,8,17,18,32,36,299,434,940,1153,1192,1278,2048,3904
සොර/20,24,49,89,153,159,247,301,424,655,692,1647,2143,2761,2940,3229
ස්වෛරී/992,1204
